Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Article 8. Fraudulent Transfers

Law reviews:

For article, “Representing the Debtor:

C

ounsel Beware”, see 23

C

olo. Law. 539 (1994); for article, “Overcoming Difficulties in Collecting Child Support and Maintenance”, see 24 Colo. Law. 2725 (1995); for article, “Litigating Claims under the Colorado Uniform Fraudulent Transfer Act”, see 45 Colo. Law. 35 (April 2016).

UNIFORM FRAUDULENT TRANSFER ACT
PREFATORY NOTE

The Uniform Fraudulent Conveyance Act was promulgated by the Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws in 1918. The Act has been adopted in 25 jurisdictions, including the Virgin Islands. It has also been adopted in the sections of the Bankruptcy Act of 1938 and the Bankruptcy Reform Act of 1978 that deal with fraudulent transfers and obligations.

The Uniform Act was a codification of the “better” decisions applying the Statute of 13 Elizabeth. See Analysis of H.R. 12339, 74th Cong., 2d Sess. 213 (1936). The English statute was enacted in some form in many states, but, whether or not so enacted, the voidability of fraudulent transfer was part of the law of every American jurisdiction. Since the intent to hinder, delay, or defraud creditors is seldom susceptible of direct proof, courts have relied on badges of fraud. The weight given these badges varied greatly from jurisdiction, and the Conference sought to minimize or eliminate the diversity by providing that proof of certain fact combinations would conclusively establish fraud. In the absence of evidence of the existence of such facts, proof of a fraudulent transfer was to depend on evidence of actual intent. An important reform effected by the Uniform Act was the elimination of any requirement that a creditor have obtained a judgment or execution returned unsatisfied before bringing an action to avoid a transfer as fraudulent. See American Surety Co. v. Conner, 251 N.Y. 1, 166 N.E. 783, 67 A.L.R. 244 (1929) (per C.J. Cardozo).

The Conference was persuaded in 1979 to appoint a committee to undertake a study of the Uniform Act with a view to preparing the draft of a revision. The Conference was influenced by the following considerations:

The Bankruptcy Reform Act of 1978 has made numerous changes in the section of that Act dealing with fraudulent transfers and obligations, thereby substantially reducing the correspondence of the provisions of the federal bankruptcy law on fraudulent transfers with the Uniform Act.

The Committee on Corporate Laws of the Section of Corporations, Banking & Business Law of the American Bar Association, engaged in revising the Model Corporation Act, suggested that the Conference review provisions of the Uniform Act with a view to determining whether the Acts are consistent in respect to the treatment of dividend distributions.

The Uniform Commercial Code (located in title 4 of C.R.S.), enacted at least in part by all 50 states, had substantially modified related rules of law regulating transfers of personal property, notably by facilitating the making and perfection of security transfers against attack by unsecured creditors.

Debtors and trustees in a number of cases have avoided foreclosure of security interests by invoking the fraudulent transfer section of the Bankruptcy Reform Act.

The Model Rules of Professional Conduct adopted by the House of Delegates of the American Bar Association on August 2, 1983, forbid a lawyer to counsel or to assist a client in conduct that the lawyer knows is fraudulent.

The Drafting Committee appointed by the Conference held its first meeting in January of 1983. A first reading of a draft of the revision of the Uniform Fraudulent Conveyance Act was had at the Conference’s meeting in Boca Raton, Florida, on July 27, 1983. The Committee held four meetings in addition to a meeting held in connection with the Conference meeting in Boca Raton. Meetings were also attended by the following representatives of interested organizations:

Robert Rosenberg, Esq., of the American Bar Association;

Richard Cherin, Esq., of the Commercial Financial Services Committee of the Corporation, Banking and Business Law Section of the American Bar Association;

Robert Zinman, Esq., of the American College of Real Estate Lawyers;

Bruce Bernstein, Esq., of the National Commercial Finance Association;

Ernest E. Specks, Esq., of the Real Property, Probate and Trust Law Section of the American Bar Association.

The Committee determined to rename the Act the Uniform Fraudulent Transfer Act in recognition of its applicability to transfers of personal property as well as real property, “conveyance” having a connotation restricting it to a transfer of personal property. As noted in Comment (2) accompanying § 1(2) (numbered as section 38-8-102 (2) in C.R.S.) and Comment (8) accompanying § 4 (numbered as section 38-8-105 in C.R.S.), however, this Act, like the original Uniform Act, does not purport to cover the whole law of voidable transfers and obligations. The limited scope of the original Act did not impair its effectiveness in achieving uniformity in the areas covered. See McLaughlin, Application of the Uniform Fraudulent Conveyance Act, 46 Harv. L. Rev. 404, 405 (1933).

The basic structure and approach of the Uniform Fraudulent Conveyance Act are preserved in the Uniform Fraudulent Transfer Act. There are two sections in the new Act delineating what transfers and obligations are fraudulent. Section 4(a) (numbered as section 38-8-105 (1) in C.R.S.) is an adaptation of three sections of the U.F.C.A.; § 5(a) (numbered as section 38-8-106 (1) in C.R.S.) is an adaptation of another section of the U.F.C.A.; and § 5(b) (numbered as section 38-8-106 (2) in C.R.S.) is new. One section of the U.F.C.A. (§ 8) is not carried forward into the new Act because deemed to be redundant in part and in part susceptible of inequitable application. Both Acts declare a transfer made or an obligation incurred with actual intent to hinder, delay, or defraud creditors to be fraudulent. Both Acts render a transfer made or obligation incurred without adequate consideration to be constructively fraudulent - i.e., without regard to the actual intent of the parties - under one of the following conditions:

(1) the debtor was left by the transfer or obligation with unreasonably small assets for a transaction or the business in which he was engaged;

(2) the debtor intended to incur, or believed that he would incur, more debts than he would be able to pay; or

(3) the debtor was insolvent at the time or as a result of the transfer or obligation.

As under the original Uniform Fraudulent Conveyance Act a transfer or obligation that is constructively fraudulent because insolvency concurs with or follows failure to receive adequate consideration is voidable only by a creditor in existence at the time the transfer occurs or the obligation is incurred. Either an existing or subsequent creditor may avoid a transfer or obligation for inadequate consideration when accompanied by the financial condition specified in § 4(a)(2)(i) (section 38-8-105 (1)(b)(I) in C.R.S.) or the mental state specified in § 4(a)(2)(ii) (section 38-8-104 (1)(b)(II) in C.R.S.).

Reasonably equivalent value is required in order to constitute adequate consideration under the revised Act. The revision follows the Bankruptcy Code in eliminating good faith on the part of the transferee or obligee as an issue in the determination of whether adequate consideration is given by a transferee or obligee. The new Act, like the Bankruptcy Act, allows the transferee or obligee to show good faith in defense after a creditor establishes that a fraudulent transfer has been made or a fraudulent obligation has been incurred. Thus a showing by a defendant that a reasonable equivalent has been given in good faith for a transfer or obligation is a complete defense although the debtor is shown to have intended to hinder, delay, or defraud creditors.

A good faith transferee or obligee who has given less than a reasonable equivalent is nevertheless allowed a reduction in liability to the extent of the value given. The new Act, like the Bankruptcy Code, eliminates the provision of the Uniform Fraudulent Conveyance Act that enables a creditor to attack a security transfer on the ground that the value of the property transferred is disproportionate to the debt secured. The premise of the new Act is that the value of the interest transferred for security is measured by and thus corresponds exactly to the debt secured. Foreclosure of a debtor’s interest by a regularly conducted, noncollusive sale on default under a mortgage or other security agreement may not be avoided under the Act as a transfer for less than a reasonably equivalent value.

The definition of insolvency under the Act is adapted from the definition of the term in the Bankruptcy Code. Insolvency is presumed from proof of a failure generally to pay debts as they become due.

The new Act adds a new category of fraudulent transfer, namely, a preferential transfer by an insolvent insider to a creditor who had reasonable cause to believe the debtor to be insolvent. An insider is defined in much the same way as in the Bankruptcy Code and includes a relative, also defined as in the Bankruptcy Code, a director or officer of a corporate debtor, a partner, or a person in control of a debtor. This provision is available only to an existing creditor. Its premise is that an insolvent debtor is obliged to pay debts to creditors not related to him before paying those who are insiders.

The new Act omits any provision directed particularly at transfers or obligations of insolvent partnership debtors. Under § 8 of the Uniform Fraudulent Conveyance Act any transfer made or obligation incurred by an insolvent partnership to a partner is fraudulent without regard to intent or adequacy of consideration. So categorical a condemnation of a partnership transaction with a partner may unfairly prejudice the interests of a partner’s separate creditors. The new Act also omits as redundant a provision in the original Act that makes fraudulent a transfer made or obligation incurred by an insolvent partnership for less than a fair consideration to the partnership.

Section 7 (numbered as section 38-8-108 in C.R.S.) lists the remedies available to creditors under the new Act. It eliminates as unnecessary and confusing a differentiation made in the original Act between the remedies available to holders of matured claims and those holding unmatured claims. Since promulgation of the Uniform Fraudulent Conveyance Act the Supreme Court has imposed restrictions on the availability and use of prejudgment remedies. As a result many states have amended their statutes and rules applicable to such remedies, and it is frequently unclear whether a state’s procedures include a prejudgment remedy against a fraudulent transfer or obligation. A bracketed paragraph is included in Section 7 for adoption by those states that elect to make such a remedy available.

Section 8 (numbered as section 38-8-109 in C.R.S.) prescribes the measure of liability of a transferee or obligee under the Act and enumerates defenses. Defenses against avoidance of a preferential transfer to an insider under § 5(b) (numbered as section 38-8-106 (2) in C.R.S.) include an adaptation of defenses available under § 547(c)(2) and (4) of the Bankruptcy Code when such a transfer is sought to be avoided as a preference by the trustee in bankruptcy. In addition a preferential transfer may be justified when shown to be made pursuant to a good faith effort to stave off forced liquidation and rehabilitate the debtor. Section 8 also precludes avoidance, as a constructively fraudulent transfer, of the termination of a lease on default or the enforcement of a security interest in compliance with Article 9 of the Uniform Commercial Code.

The new Act includes a new section specifying when a transfer is made or an obligation is incurred. The section specifying the time when a transfer occurs is adapted from Section 548(d) of the Bankruptcy Code. Its premise is that if the law prescribes a mode for making the transfer a matter of public record or notice, it is not deemed to be made for any purpose under the Act until it has become such a matter of record or notice.

The new Act also includes a statute of limitations that bars the right rather than the remedy on expiration of the statutory periods prescribed. The law governing limitations on actions to avoid fraudulent transfers among the states is unclear and full of diversity. The Act recognizes that laches and estoppel may operate to preclude a particular creditor from pursuing a remedy against a fraudulent transfer or obligation even though the statutory period of limitations has not run.

38-8-101.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Colorado Uniform Fraudulent Transfer Act”.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1681, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor’s note - Colorado legislative change:

This section was numbered as section 12 in the uniform act. Colorado placed it here and renumbered the succeeding sections accordingly. Colorado also used its own numbering system for subsections and paragraphs within sections. Where necessary, these changes will be noted in the comments.

38-8-102.
Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Affiliate” means:

A person who directly or indirectly owns, controls, or holds with power to vote twenty percent or more of the outstanding voting securities of the debtor, other than a person who holds the securities:

As a fiduciary or agent without sole discretionary power to vote the securities; or

Solely to secure a debt, if the person has not exercised the power to vote;

A corporation, twenty percent or more of whose outstanding voting securities are directly or indirectly owned, controlled, or held with power to vote, by the debtor or a person who directly or indirectly owns, controls, or holds with power to vote, twenty percent or more of the outstanding voting securities of the debtor, other than a person who holds the securities:

As a fiduciary or agent without sole power to vote the securities; or

Solely to secure a debt, if the person has not in fact exercised the power to vote;

A person whose business is operated by the debtor under a lease or other agreement, or a person substantially all of whose assets are controlled by the debtor; or

A person who operates the debtor’s business under a lease or other agreement or controls substantially all of the debtor’s assets.

“Asset” means property of a debtor. “Asset” shall not include:

Property to the extent it is encumbered by a valid lien;

Property to the extent it is generally exempt immediately prior to the time of transfer under nonbankruptcy law; or

An interest in property held in tenancy by the entireties to the extent it is not subject to process by a creditor holding a claim against only one tenant.

“Claim” means a right to payment, whether or not the right is reduced to judgment, liquidated, unliquidated, fixed, contingent, matured, unmatured, disputed, undisputed, legal, equitable, secured, or unsecured.

“Control” of a debtor or debtor’s property by another person does not include conduct undertaken by the other person to enforce rights existing under a valid agreement, entered into in good faith and not primarily for the purpose of obtaining control of the debtor or the debtor’s property, including without limitation a lease of such property.

“Creditor” means a person who has a claim.

“Debt” means liability on a claim.

“Debtor” means a person who is liable on a claim.

“Insider” means:

If the debtor is an individual:

A relative of the debtor or of a general partner of the debtor;

A partnership in which the debtor is a general partner;

A general partner in a partnership described in subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (a); or

A corporation of which the debtor is a director, officer, or person in control;

If the debtor is a corporation:

A director of the debtor;

An officer of the debtor;

A person in control of the debtor;

A partnership in which the debtor is a general partner;

A general partner in a partnership described in subparagraph (IV) of this paragraph (b); or

A relative of a general partner, director, officer, or person in control of the debtor;

If the debtor is a partnership:

A general partner in the debtor;

A relative of a general partner in, or a general partner of, or a person in control of the debtor;

Another partnership in which the debtor is a general partner;

A general partner in a partnership described in subparagraph (III) of this paragraph (c); or

A person in control of the debtor;

An affiliate, or an insider of an affiliate as if the affiliate were the debtor; or

A managing agent of the debtor.

“Lien” means a charge against or an interest in property to secure payment of a debt or performance of an obligation, and includes a security interest created by agreement, a judicial lien obtained by legal or equitable process or proceedings, a common-law lien, or a statutory lien.

“Person” means an individual, partnership, corporation, association, organization, government or governmental subdivision or agency, business trust, estate, trust, or any other legal or commercial entity.

“Property” means anything that may be the subject of ownership.

“Relative” means an individual related by consanguinity within the third degree as determined by the common law, a spouse, or an individual related to a spouse within the third degree as so determined, and includes an individual in an adoptive relationship within the third degree.

“Transfer” means every mode, direct or indirect, absolute or conditional, voluntary or involuntary, of disposing of or parting with an asset or an interest in an asset, and includes payment of money, release, lease, and creation of a lien or other encumbrance.

“Valid lien” means a lien that is effective against the holder of a judicial lien subsequently obtained by legal or equitable process or proceedings.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1681, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor’s note - Colorado legislative change:

This section was numbered as section 1 in the uniform act. In the introductory portion to this section, after the word “article”, Colorado added a comma and the words “unless the context otherwise requires”. In the introductory portion to subsection (2), Colorado replaced a comma with a period and changed the words “but the term does not include” to “‘Asset ’ shall not include”. In subsection (2)(b), after “exempt”, Colorado added “immediately prior to the time of transfer”. The definition of “control” in subsection (4) has been added and subsequent definitions renumbered accordingly. In subsection (8), the word “means” has been substituted for “includes”.

38-8-103.
Insolvency.

A debtor is insolvent if the sum of the debtor’s debts is greater than all of the debtor’s assets at a fair valuation.

A debtor who is generally not paying his debts as they become due is presumed to be insolvent.

A partnership is insolvent under subsection (1) of this section if the sum of the partnership’s debts is greater than the aggregate of all of the partnership’s assets, at a fair valuation, and the sum of the excess of the value of each general partner’s nonpartnership assets over the partner’s nonpartnership debts.

Assets under this section do not include property that has been transferred, concealed, or removed with intent to hinder, delay, or defraud creditors or that has been transferred in a manner making the transfer voidable under this article.

Debts under this section do not include an obligation to the extent it is secured by a valid lien on property of the debtor not included as an asset.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1684, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor’s note - Colorado legislative change:

This section was numbered as section 2 in the uniform act. In subsection (3), the phrase “at a fair valuation” has been moved from immediately after “aggregate” to immediately after the first “assets”.

38-8-104.
Value.

Value is given for a transfer or an obligation if, in exchange for the transfer or obligation, property is transferred or an antecedent debt is secured or satisfied, but value does not include an unperformed promise made otherwise than in the ordinary course of the promisor’s business to furnish support to the debtor or another person.

For the purposes of sections 38-8-105 and 38-8-106, a person gives a reasonably equivalent value if the person acquires an interest of the debtor in an asset pursuant to a regularly conducted, noncollusive sale, foreclosing on assets subject to a lien, or pursuant to the execution of a power of sale for the acquisition or disposition of the interest of the debtor upon default under a mortgage, deed of trust, or security agreement.

A transfer is made for present value if the exchange between the debtor and the transferee is intended by them to be contemporaneous and is in fact substantially contemporaneous.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1684, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor’s note - Colorado legislative change:

This section was numbered as section 3 in the uniform act. In subsection (2), after “conducted,”, the phrase “noncollusive foreclosure sale or execution” has been changed to “noncollusive sale, foreclosing on assets subject to a lien, or pursuant to the execution”.

38-8-105.
Transfers fraudulent as to present and future creditors.

A transfer made or obligation incurred by a debtor is fraudulent as to a creditor, whether the creditor’s claim arose before or after the transfer was made or the obligation was incurred, if the debtor made the transfer or incurred the obligation:

With actual intent to hinder, delay, or defraud any creditor of the debtor; or

Without receiving a reasonably equivalent value in exchange for the transfer or obligation, and the debtor:

Was engaged or was about to engage in a business or a transaction for which the remaining assets of the debtor were unreasonably small in relation to the business or transaction; or

Intended to incur, or believed or reasonably should have believed that he would incur, debts beyond his ability to pay as they became due.

In determining actual intent under paragraph

of subsection (1) of this section, consideration may be given, among other factors, to whether:

(a)

The transfer or obligation was to an insider;

The debtor retained possession or control of the property transferred after the transfer;

The transfer or obligation was disclosed or concealed;

Before the transfer was made or obligation was incurred, the debtor had been sued or threatened with suit;

The transfer was of substantially all the debtor’s assets;

The debtor absconded;

The debtor removed or concealed assets;

The value of the consideration received by the debtor was reasonably equivalent to the value of the asset transferred or the amount of the obligation incurred;

The debtor was insolvent or became insolvent shortly after the transfer was made or the obligation was incurred;

The transfer occurred shortly before or shortly after a substantial debt was incurred; and

The debtor transferred the essential assets of the business to a lienor who transferred the assets to an insider of the debtor.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1685, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor’s note - Colorado legislative change:

This section was numbered as section 4 in the uniform act.

38-8-106.
Transfers fraudulent as to present creditors.

A transfer made or obligation incurred by a debtor is fraudulent as to a creditor whose claim arose before the transfer was made or the obligation was incurred if the debtor made the transfer or incurred the obligation without receiving a reasonably equivalent value in exchange for the transfer or obligation and the debtor was insolvent at that time or the debtor became insolvent as a result of the transfer or obligation.

A transfer made by a debtor is fraudulent as to a creditor whose claim arose before the transfer was made if the transfer was made to an insider for an antecedent debt, the debtor was insolvent at that time, and the insider had reasonable cause to believe that the debtor was insolvent.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1686, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor’s note - Colorado legislative change:

This section was numbered as section 5 in the uniform act.

38-8-107.
When transfer is made or obligation is incurred.

For the purposes of this article:

A transfer is made:

With respect to an asset that is real property other than a fixture, but including the interest of a seller or purchaser under a contract for the sale of the asset, when the transfer is so far perfected that a good-faith purchaser of the asset from the debtor against whom applicable law permits the transfer to be perfected cannot acquire an interest in the asset that is superior to the interest of the transferee; and

With respect to an asset that is not real property or that is a fixture, when the transfer is so far perfected that a creditor on a simple contract cannot acquire a judicial lien otherwise than under this article that is superior to the interest of the transferee.

If applicable law permits the transfer to be perfected as provided in subsection (1) of this section and the transfer is not so perfected before the commencement of an action for relief under this article, the transfer is deemed made immediately before the commencement of the action.

If applicable law does not permit the transfer to be perfected as provided in subsection (1) of this section, the transfer is made when it becomes effective between the debtor and the transferee.

A transfer is not made until the debtor has acquired rights in the asset transferred.

An obligation is incurred:

If oral, when it becomes effective between the parties; or

If evidenced by a writing, when the writing executed by the obligor is delivered to or for the benefit of the obligee.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1686, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor’s note - Colorado legislative change:

This section was numbered as section 6 in the uniform act.

38-8-108.
Remedies of creditors.

In an action for relief against a transfer or obligation under this article, a creditor, subject to the limitations in section 38-8-109, may obtain:

Avoidance of the transfer or obligation to the extent necessary to satisfy the creditor’s claim;

An attachment or other provisional remedy against the asset transferred or other property of the transferee in accordance with the procedure prescribed by the Colorado rules of civil procedure;

With respect to a transfer made or obligation incurred that is fraudulent under section 38-8-105 (1)(a), a judgment for one and one-half the value of the asset transferred or for one and one-half the amount necessary to satisfy the creditor’s claim, whichever is less, together with the creditor’s actual costs; except that any judgment entered against a person under this paragraph (c) is in lieu of, not in addition to, a judgment against the same person under section 38-8-109 (2). No judgment may be entered pursuant to this paragraph (c) against a person other than the debtor unless that person also acts with wrongful intent as defined in section 38-8-105 (1)(a); otherwise, judgment for money damages against a person other than the debtor may be entered only as provided in section 38-8-109. No judgment may be entered under this paragraph (c) unless a court of competent jurisdiction enters or has entered a judgment or order establishing the validity of the creditor’s claim against the debtor.

Subject to applicable principles of equity and in accordance with applicable rules of civil procedure:

An injunction against further disposition by the debtor or a transferee, or both, of the asset transferred or of other property;

Appointment of a receiver to take charge of the asset transferred or of other property of the transferee; or

Any other relief the circumstances may require.

If a creditor has obtained a judgment on a claim against the debtor, the creditor, if the court so orders, may levy execution on the asset transferred or its proceeds.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1687, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2014:

(1) amended,(HB 14-1302), ch. 143, p. 489, § 1, effective May 2.

38-8-109.
Defenses, liability, and protection of transferee.

A transfer or obligation is not voidable under section 38-8-105 (1)(a) against a person who took in good faith and for a reasonably equivalent value or against any subsequent transferee or obligee.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, to the extent a transfer is voidable in an action by a creditor under section 38-8-108 (1)(a), the creditor may recover judgment for the value of the asset transferred, as adjusted under subsection (3) of this section, or the amount necessary to satisfy the creditor’s claim, whichever is less. The judgment may be entered against:

The first transferee of the asset or the person for whose benefit the transfer was made; or

Any subsequent transferee other than a good-faith transferee or obligee who took for value or from any subsequent transferee or obligee.

If the judgment under subsection (2) of this section is based upon the value of the asset transferred, the judgment must be for an amount equal to the value of the asset at the time of the transfer, subject to adjustment as the equities may require.

Notwithstanding voidability of a transfer or an obligation under this article, a good-faith transferee or obligee is entitled, to the extent of the value given the debtor for the transfer or obligation, to:

A lien on or a right to retain any interest in the asset transferred;

Enforcement of any obligation incurred; or

A reduction in the amount of the liability on the judgment.

A transfer is not voidable under section 38-8-105 (1)(b) or 38-8-106 if the transfer results from:

Termination of a lease upon default by the debtor when the termination is pursuant to the lease and applicable law; or

Enforcement of a security interest in compliance with the provisions of the “Uniform Commercial Code - Secured Transactions”, article 9 of title 4, C.R.S.

A transfer is not voidable under section 38-8-106 (2):

To the extent the insider gave new value to or for the benefit of the debtor after the transfer was made unless the new value was secured by a valid lien;

If made in the ordinary course of business or financial affairs of the debtor and the insider; or

If made pursuant to a good-faith effort to rehabilitate the debtor and the transfer secured present value given for that purpose as well as an antecedent debt of the debtor.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1687, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor’s note - Colorado legislative change:

This section was numbered as section 8 in the uniform act. In subsection (2) (b), the phrase “or obligee” has been added after “transferee” in both places where “transferee” appears.

38-8-110.
Extinguishment of cause of action.

A cause of action with respect to a fraudulent transfer or obligation under this article is extinguished unless action is brought:

Under section 38-8-105 (1)(a), within four years after the transfer was made or the obligation was incurred or, if later, within one year after the transfer or obligation was or could reasonably have been discovered by the claimant;

Under section 38-8-105 (1)(b) or 38-8-106 (1), within four years after the transfer was made or the obligation was incurred; or

Under section 38-8-106 (2), within one year after the transfer was made or the obligation was incurred.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1689, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor’s note - Colorado legislative change:

This section was numbered as section 9 in the uniform act.

38-8-111.
Supplementary provisions.

Unless displaced by the provisions of this article, the principles of law and equity, including the law merchant and the law relating to principal and agent, estoppel, laches, fraud, misrepresentation, duress, coercion, mistake, insolvency, or other validating or invalidating cause, supplement the provisions of this article.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1689, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor’s note - Colorado legislative change:

This section was numbered as section 10 in the uniform act.

38-8-112.
Uniformity of application and construction.

This article shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this article.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1689, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor’s note - Colorado legislative change:

This section was numbered as section 11 in the uniform act. Colorado deleted the phrase “among states enacting it” from the end of this section.